Mississippi, session 2026, SB2997.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to Washington County for the purpose of defraying costs associated with certain infrastructure projects for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.. $ 7,258,020.00. SECTION 2.  Of the funds appropriated by Section 1 of this act, the following amounts are to be allocated as follows: To defray costs of improvements to Broadway Road from Metcalfe to the Greenville Mid-Delta Airport................................. $ 1,547,410.00 To defray costs of improvements to community parks......................... $ 1,547,410.00 To defray costs of improvements to Old Leland Road from Highway 1 to Raceway Road......................... $ 1,400,000.00 To defray costs of improvements to California Street Highway 82 to Robertshaw Street.................... $ 1,200,000.00 To defray costs of safety improvements to the intersection of Highway 61 and Highway 12............. $   200,000.00 To defray costs of improvements to Surillo Street.......................... $   648,064.00 To defray costs of improvements to Mourning Dove Street.................... $   340,136.00 To defray costs of safety improvements to Simmons High School............................. $    75,000.00 To defray costs of improvements, repairs, and renovations to Chambers Middle School.................. $   300,000.00 SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.